Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXVIII Mines and Minerals
Blasting Regulations

351.310.
Definitions for KRS 351.315 to 351.375.

As used in KRS

351.315

to

351.375

unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:

“Explosives” means any chemical compound or other substance or mechanical system intended for the purpose of producing an explosion, or that contains oxidizing and combustible units or other ingredients in such proportions or quantities that ignition by detonation may produce an explosion, capable of causing injury to persons or damage to property;

“Blasting operation” means the use of explosives in the surface blasting of stone, rock, ore or any other natural formation, or in any construction or demolition work, but shall not include its use in agricultural operations;

“Blaster” means a person licensed to fire or detonate explosives in blasting operations;

“Charge” means a quantity of explosive or equivalent that is to be detonated within a period of five (5) seconds;

“Subcharge” means a quantity of explosive or equivalent that is to be detonated within a period of less than eight (8) milliseconds;

“Detonation time” means the time at which the detonation is initiated;

“Department” means the Department for Natural Resources; and

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 280, § 1; 1976, ch. 143, § 1; 2002, ch. 355, § 7, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 123, § 61, effective June 20, 2005.

351.315.
Licensing of blaster — Training requirements.

No person shall detonate explosives in any blasting operation in which more than five (5) pounds of explosives or the equivalent are used in a single charge or in which less than five (5) pounds of explosives are used by a regular user, excluding blasting for agriculture and underground coal, unless he is licensed by the department. The department shall issue a license to use explosives to any person who:

Has worked in blasting operations for at least twenty-four (24) months under the immediate supervision of an experienced blaster or has worked in blasting operations for twelve (12) months and has completed a formal training program approved by the department; and

Has passed an examination prescribed by the department which shall test the examinee’s practice of blasting operations and the storage, moving, handling, and detonation of explosives.

Application for license shall be in writing upon a form furnished by the department and shall be accompanied by a photograph of the applicant. If the applicant is successful in passing the examination, a license indicating his competency to detonate explosives shall be issued upon the payment of a fee of twenty-five dollars ($25).

Any person who is a licensed blaster in another state where the qualifications prescribed at the time of licensing were, in the opinion of the commissioner, equal to those prescribed in the Commonwealth at the date of application, and where reciprocal licensing privileges satisfactory to the department are granted to licensees of the Commonwealth, may be granted a license without an examination, upon the payment of a fee.

Each blaster shall be required to renew his license every three (3) years by application to the department, which application shall be accompanied by a fee and subject to the following training requirements:

Each applicant for renewal of a Kentucky blaster’s license shall furnish proof that during the preceding three (3) years, the blaster annually has attended a minimum of eight (8) hours of department-approved blaster’s training. No more than four (4) hours of the annual blaster training may be attributed to attending a conference unless otherwise approved by the department; and

Each applicant for renewal of a limited Kentucky blaster’s license shall furnish proof that during the preceding three (3) years, the blaster has attended a minimum of four (4) hours of blaster’s training approved by the department.

The department shall not issue a blaster’s license to any person not entitled to transport or receive explosives under existing federal law, including persons who:

Are less than twenty-one (21) years of age; or

Have been convicted in any court of a crime punishable by imprisonment for a term exceeding one (1) year, unless the conviction has been specifically exempted by the United States Bureau of Alcohol, Tobacco and Firearms or its successor.

All fees provided in this section shall be set by the department by administrative regulation; however, the fee for an application shall not exceed forty dollars ($40), the fee for license renewal shall not exceed sixty dollars ($60), and the fee for reciprocal licensing shall not exceed sixty dollars ($60).

The commissioner may suspend any license for due cause, but no license may be revoked until the licensee has been granted adequate opportunity for a hearing before the cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 2; 1978, ch. 240, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1996, ch. 150, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1996, ch. 318, § 332, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 25, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 94, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2018 ch. 85, § 11, effective July 14, 2018.

351.320.
Detonation of explosives in blasting operations — Qualifications and licensing of blaster. [Repealed.]

351.325.
Classification of blasters.

The department may institute classifications of blasters for the purpose of insuring adequate skill in different types of blasting operations. Classification will be determined by passage of a corresponding examination.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 3.

351.330.
Requirements governing blasting operations.

Blasting of explosives for use in the neighborhood of any public highway, stream of water, dwelling house, public building, school, church, commercial or institutional building, pipeline, or utility shall be done in accordance with the provisions of this section, and rules and regulations promulgated by the department.

Where necessary in a blasting operation, the department may require that the operator submit a blasting plan to the department for approval.

In all blasting operations, except as hereinafter otherwise provided, the maximum peak particle velocity of the ground motion in any direction shall not exceed two (2) inches per second at the immediate location of any dwelling house, public building, school, church, commercial or institutional building, and the particle velocity at such location immediately after a period of one (1) second following the peak particle velocity produced by any charge shall not continuously exceed one-half (1/2) inch per second.

Blasting operations without instrumentation will be considered as being within the limits set forth in this subsection if such blasting operations are conducted in accordance with rules and regulations of the department establishing the maximum amount of explosives to be used in a single charge and in a single subcharge within specified distances from any location provided by subsection (1) of this section. No more than 40,000 pounds of explosives may be used in any charge except with the approval of the commissioner. Regulations promulgated by the department pursuant to this subsection shall be in such terms that compliance therewith will assure compliance with the provisions of subsection (3) of this section.

No two (2) consecutive subcharges containing the maximum permitted by the department pursuant to this subsection shall have a detonation time separated by less than eight (8) milliseconds, except that if the amount of explosive used in any subcharge is less than maximum permitted by the department pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the time delay between detonation times may be decreased in the same ratio.

Any blasting operation may be conducted without reference to any maximum amount or period provided by or pursuant to subsection (4) of this section if the operator of such blasting operation demonstrates by instrumentation that maximum particle velocity of the ground motion in any direction does not exceed the limits provided in subsection (3) of this section.

Instruments for determining particle velocity as set forth in this subsection shall be limited to such specific types of devices as shall have been expressly approved by the department and the commissioner or his duly authorized agent may enter upon any premises for the purpose of conducting or supervising any necessary instrumentations provided by KRS

351.315

to

351.375

.

When blasting operations are contemplated which would result in ground vibrations that would have a particle velocity in any direction in excess of two (2) inches per second at the immediate location of any dwelling house, public building, school, church, commercial or institutional building, blasting operations may proceed after receiving written consent from the property owner or owners affected.

When blasting operations, other than those conducted at a fixed site as a part of any industry or business operated at such site, are to be conducted within the vicinity of a pipeline or public utility, the blaster or person in charge of the blasting operations shall take due precautionary measures for the protection of the pipeline or utility, and shall give adequate notice to the owner or his agent that such blasting operations are intended. The blaster shall be subject to regulations promulgated by the department concerning such a blasting operation.

Blasting operations near streams shall be prohibited in all cases where the effect of the blasting is liable to change the course or channel of any stream without first obtaining a permit from the department which has been approved by the Division of Water in the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

Blasting operations shall not be conducted within eight hundred (800) feet of any public highway, unless due precautionary measures are taken to safeguard the public.

Mudcapping in blasting operations shall be permitted only where it would endanger the safety of the workers to drill the rock or material to be blasted. If mudcapping is necessary, no more than ten (10) pounds of explosives shall be used for each charge.

When the use of detonating cord would cause severe air blast the department may cause all trunk lines to be covered by five (5) to six (6) inches of loose earth.

In blasting operations, flying rocks shall not be allowed to fall greater than one-half (1/2) the distance between the blast and a dwelling house, public building, school, church, or commercial or institutional building. Protective material shall be used to insure this limit.

When a blast is about to be fired, ample warning shall be given to allow all persons to retreat to a safe place, and care shall be taken to ascertain that all persons are in the clear. Each operator shall follow a definite plan of warning signals that can be clearly seen or heard by anyone in the blasting area. The operator shall inform all employees at the operation as to the established procedure.

No person shall use explosives in such manner that safety to persons or property is threatened.

The two (2)-inch-per-second maximum peak particle velocity as specified in subsections (3) and (8) of this section shall be construed as the threshold below which blasting damage is unlikely to occur. However, the department shall have the authority to promulgate regulations requiring more restrictive levels of maximum peak particle velocity when necessary to maintain consistency with federal statutes or regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1972, ch. 280, § 3; 1976, ch. 143, § 4; 1978, ch. 337, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 2010, ch. 24, § 1902, effective July 15, 2010.

351.335.
Rules and regulations — Authority of commissioner or his representative.

The department shall have the authority for promulgating regulations concerning the manufacture, transportation, sale, storage, or use of explosives and unassembled components of explosives including, but not limited to, airblasts, preblast surveys, and blasting schedules, and the maintenance of such explosives which has a direct bearing on safety to life and property, and any other rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the provisions of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

or which are consistent with the provisions of the Federal Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of 1977, and amendments thereto, pertaining to blasting or explosives, or any rule or regulation promulgated thereunder pertaining to blasting or explosives. No portion of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

shall apply in any manner to the manufacture, transportation, sale, storage, possession, or use of:

Loaded ammunition for use in small arms or other weapons; or

Propellant powders for use in small arms or other weapons; or

Primers for small arms ammunition; or

Any other component part of small arms ammunition; or

Tools, equipment, or devices for the manufacture of small arms ammunition; or

Grades of blackpowder suitable primarily for use in firearms.

To promote compatible, uniform, and consistent laws and regulations concerning blasting, all local ordinances, rules, and regulations concerning blasting and explosives promulgated by units of local government within the Commonwealth shall be reviewed and approved, by the department, prior to implementation. Any not so approved shall be invalid. Any local ordinance, rule, or regulation in force on June 19, 1976, shall become invalid, null, and void one hundred twenty (120) days after June 19, 1976, unless it is submitted to the department and is approved as being consistent with the provisions of this section.

In order to carry out the purposes of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

, the commissioner or his authorized representative shall have the authority:

To enter without delay and advance notice any place where explosives are in use or stored or where blasting records are kept, during regular working hours and at other reasonable times in order to inspect such places, question any explosive user or seller for the purpose of ascertaining compliance or noncompliance with KRS

351.315

to

351.375

.

To administer oaths, take depositions, conduct hearings, take photographs, review any and all blasting records, and secure any other evidence deemed necessary to evaluate any safety hazard in KRS 351.315 to 351.375 or regulations issued pursuant thereto.

If an explosive user or seller refuses such entry, then the commissioner or his authorized representative may apply to the Franklin Circuit Court, or to the Circuit Court within the county wherein the premises to be entered are located, for an order to enforce the right of entry.

If, during the course of a lawful inspection, the commissioner or his authorized representative discovers explosives stored or kept in an unlawful manner and such unlawfully stored or kept explosives constitute an imminent and substantial danger to life or property, then the commissioner or his authorized representative may, upon proper affidavit before a magistrate with authority and jurisdiction to issue search warrants, obtain a warrant authorizing seizure of such unlawfully stored or kept explosives and thereby seize and store such explosives in a lawful and safe manner.

No warrant pursuant to this section shall be issued unless the commissioner or his authorized representative has made arrangements with public or private sources for the lawful and safe storage of the explosives to be seized.

No warrant pursuant to this section shall be issued upon an affidavit that does not aver that an arrangement has been made between the commissioner or his authorized representative and public or private sources for the lawful and safe storage of the explosives to be seized.

No warrant pursuant to this section shall be issued upon an affidavit that does not specifically state the place in which the explosives are to be stored in terms of city, county, street address, and name of person, company, or agency accepting the explosives for storage.

Any owner or person entitled to lawful possession of explosives seized pursuant to this section shall be entitled to recovery of the seized explosives upon written or verbal notification to the commissioner or his authorized representative stating his capability to lawfully and safely store the seized explosives, and upon an inspection by the commissioner or his representative of his storage facilities and methods that reveals his capability to lawfully and safely store the explosives.

The commissioner or his authorized representative shall make the inspection within five (5) days of receipt of said notification.

If the commissioner or his authorized representative receive no communication from the owner or person entitled to lawful possession of the seized explosives within thirty (30) days after the seizure of such explosives, then the commissioner or his authorized representative may dispose of the seized explosives in a safe and lawful manner.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 5; 1978, ch. 337, § 2, effective June 17, 1978.

351.340.
Rules and regulations — Inspections. [Repealed.]

351.345.
Revocation of license — Hearing.

The commissioner, before revoking any license shall set the matter down for a hearing before the cabinet’s Office of Administrative Hearings.

No person shall blast once his license has been revoked by the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 9; 1980, ch. 114, § 101, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 333, effective July 15, 1996; 2018 ch. 85, § 12, effective July 14, 2018.

351.350.
Citation for violation — Action against violator.

If upon inspection an authorized representative of the commissioner finds that an explosive user or seller has violated any requirement of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

, a citation shall be issued to the violator. Each citation shall describe the alleged violation, establish the time period permitted for correction by fixing a reasonable date by which the alleged violation shall be eliminated, if applicable, and propose the civil penalty to be paid. If within fifteen (15) working days from the receipt of the citation the explosive user or seller fails to notify the commissioner that he intends to contest the citation, then the citation shall be deemed a final order and not be subject to review by any court or agency.

If the explosive user or seller notifies the commissioner that he intends to challenge a citation issued under KRS

351.315

to

351.375

, then it shall be the duty of the department or the cabinet’s Office of General Counsel upon the request of the commissioner, to bring an action for the recovery of the penalties provided for herein.

It shall be the duty of the cabinet’s Office of General Counsel, upon the request of the commissioner, to bring an action for a restraining order, temporary or permanent injunction against any operator or other person violating or threatening to violate any of the provisions of KRS

351.315

to

351.375

.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 7; 2018 ch. 85, § 13, effective July 14, 2018.

351.355.
Notification of accident — Investigation.

Whenever serious injury, as defined in KRS

500.080

, or loss of life occurs in a blasting operation, the blaster shall immediately give notice forthwith to the department stating the particulars of the accident. To aid in making an investigation of the accident, the commissioner may compel the attendance of witnesses and administer oaths.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 8.

351.360.
Records required.

A record of each blast shall be kept. All records including seismograph reports shall be retained at least five (5) years and shall be available for inspection by the department and shall contain such data as the commissioner determines.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 9.

351.365.
Supplier of explosives to keep register and to register with department.

Any person who sells, lends, or gives any explosives or blasting agents shall keep a register showing the amount sold, lent, or given, the date of the sale, loan, or gift and for what purpose it is to be used. Such person shall also be required to register with the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 10.

351.367.
Permit to purchase, receive, or take possession of explosives — Procedures — Restrictions — Records.

No person, firm, association, or corporation shall purchase, receive, or take possession of explosives without first obtaining a permit from the department.

The application for a permit to purchase, receive, or take possession of explosives shall be on a form prescribed by the department and shall be accompanied by an application fee of twenty dollars ($20). The application shall indicate the applicant’s name, address, type of business, the location at which the explosives will be used and stored, and the purpose for which the explosives will be used. On those operations for which licensed blasters or certified shotfirers are required, their names and license numbers or certification numbers shall be included on the application.

Any person, firm, association, or corporation who procures a license from the department to operate a coal or clay mine, pursuant to KRS

351.175

, and who at the time of application for license requests a permit to purchase, receive, or take possession of explosives, shall be issued a permit by the department without cost to the applicant.

Permits to purchase, receive, or take possession of explosives shall be valid for a period not to exceed one (1) year from the date of issue and shall not be transferable.

Permits shall be issued only to those persons, firms, associations, or corporations who have proper facilities to store explosives, or to those who provide to the department a written plan documenting the manner in which any excess explosives shall be handled and returned to proper storage facilities.

Explosive materials shall not be sold, given, delivered, or transferred to any person not possessing a valid permit to purchase or receive them.

Anyone who sells, gives, or distributes explosives shall maintain accurate records for each sale or gift of explosives, listing the name, address, and permit number of the person or company receiving the explosives and the quantity and types of explosives received.

The commissioner may suspend a permit for a period of twenty (20) days for due cause; however, a permit may not be revoked until completion of a hearing, which shall be conducted in accordance with KRS

351.345

.

Explosives which are transferred, sold, or distributed, for the purpose of resale, by a registered explosive dealer or manufacturer to another registered dealer or manufacturer shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 151, § 1, effective July 15, 1996.

351.370.
Purchase of explosives.

Any person who is a resident of this Commonwealth and who uses explosive materials in the conduct of business or occupation may lawfully purchase explosive materials from a seller located or residing in a state contiguous to this Commonwealth; provided, such person is properly licensed or registered under KRS

351.315

to

351.375

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 11.

351.375.
Restriction of sale and use of hazardous explosives.

The department may promulgate regulations restricting the sale and use of certain hazardous explosive compounds including, but not limited to, liquid nitroglycerin, fulminate of mercury, and lead azide.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 143, § 12.

351.380.
Agreements with Natural Resources and Environmental Protection Cabinet. [Repealed]

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 337, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; repealed by 2018 ch. 85, § 16, effective July 14, 2018.